Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 21 Dead Bodies

Cross references.

Criminal penalty for concealing death of person, §

16-10-31

.

Disposal of aborted fetuses, §

16-12-141.1

.

Maintenance of vital records, T. 31, C. 10.

Death certificates, §

31-10-15

.

Duty of county to pay for interment of deceased indigent persons, §

36-12-5

.

Funeral directors, embalmers, and operators of funeral establishments, T. 43, C. 18.

Anatomical gifts, §

44-5-140

et seq.

Post-mortem examinations and autopsies, §

45-16-20

et seq.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Organization and regulation of funeral services, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia State Board of Funeral Service, Chapter 250-1 et seq.